North Carolina statutes. Chapter 30. Surviving Spouses.
Part 2. Assigned by Magistrate or Clerk.

§ 30-19.
Value of property ascertained.

The value of the personal property assigned to the surviving spouse and children shall be ascertained by a magistrate or the clerk of court of the county in which administration was granted or the will probated.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 13; Code, s. 2121; Rev., s. 3097; C.S., s. 4114; 1961, c. 749, s. 5; 1971, c. 528, s. 22; 1989, c. 11, s. 1; 1997-310, s. 3.

§ 30-20.
Procedure for assignment.

Upon the application of the surviving spouse, a child by the child’s guardian or next friend, or the personal representative of the deceased, the clerk of superior court of the county in which the deceased resided may assign the inquiry to a magistrate of the county. The clerk of court, or magistrate upon assignment, shall ascertain the person or persons entitled to an allowance according to the provisions of this Article, and determine the money or other personal property of the estate, and pay over to or assign to the surviving spouse and to the children, if any, so much thereof as they shall be entitled to as provided in this Article. Any deficiencies shall be made up from any of the personal property of the deceased, and if the personal property of the estate shall be insufficient to satisfy the allowance, the clerk of the superior court shall enter judgment against the personal representative for the amount of the deficiency, to be paid when a sufficiency of such assets shall come into the personal representative’s hands.

History.

1870-1, c. 263; Code, s. 2122; 1891, c. 13; 1899, c. 531; Rev., s. 3098; C.S., s. 4115; 1961, c. 749, s. 6; 1971, c. 528, s. 23; 1989, c. 11, s. 2; 1997-310, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 7; 2012-71, s. 2(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the child’s guardian” for “his guardian or next friend” in the first sentence, and substituted “the personal representative’s hands” for “his hands” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2012-71, s. 2(b), effective June 26, 2012, added “or next friend” in the first sentence, and in the third sentence, substituted “the allowance” for “such allowance”, and “the deficiency” for “such deficiency”.

§ 30-21.
Report of clerk or magistrate.

The clerk of court, or magistrate upon assignment, shall make and sign three lists of the money or other personal property assigned to each person, stating their quantity and value, and the deficiency to be paid by the personal representative. Where the allowance is to the surviving spouse, one of these lists shall be delivered to the surviving spouse. Where the allowance is to a child, one of these lists shall be delivered to the surviving parent with whom the child is living; or to the child’s guardian or next friend if the child is not living with the surviving parent; or to the child if the child is not living with the surviving parent and has no guardian or next friend. One list shall be delivered to the personal representative. One list shall be returned by the magistrate or clerk, within 20 days after the assignment, to the superior court of the county in which administration was granted or the will probated, and the clerk shall file and record the list, together with any judgment entered pursuant to

G.S. 30-20

.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 15; Code, s. 2123; Rev., s. 3099; C.S., s. 4116; 1961, c. 749, s. 7; 1971, c. 528, s. 24; 1989, c. 11, s. 3; 1997-310, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 7; 2012-71, s. 2(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “delivered to the surviving spouse” for “delivered to him” in the second sentence, and twice deleted “or next friend” following “guardian” in the third sentence.

Session Laws 2012-71, s. 2(c), effective June 26, 2012, in the third sentence, added “or next friend” twice, and substituted “with the surviving” for “with said surviving”, and substituted “if the child” for “if said child”, and substituted “list” for “same” in the fifth sentence.

§ 30-22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 528, s. 25.

§ 30-23.
Right of appeal.

The personal representative, or the surviving spouse, or child by a the child’s guardian or next friend, or any creditor, devisee, or heir of the deceased, may appeal from the finding of the magistrate or clerk of court to the superior court of the county, by filing a copy of the assignment and a notice of appeal within 10 days after the assignment, and the appeal shall be heard as provided in

G.S. 1-301.2

, provided that the hearing on the appeal shall be at the next available session of superior court.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 16; Code, s. 2124; 1897, c. 442; Rev., s. 3100; C.S., s. 4117; 1961, c. 749, s. 9; 1989, c. 11, s. 4; 1997-310, s. 3; 2011-284, s. 23; 2011-344, s. 7; 2012-71, s. 2(d).

§ 30-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 17; Code, s. 2125; Rev., s. 3101; C.S., s. 4118; 1989, c. 11, s. 5; 1997-310, s. 3; repealed by Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012.

§ 30-25.
Personal representative entitled to credit.

Upon the settlement of the accounts of the personal representative, the personal representative shall be credited with the articles assigned, and the value of the deficiency assessed as aforesaid, if the same shall have been paid, unless the allowance be impeached for fraud or gross negligence in him.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 18; Code, s. 2126; Rev., s. 3102; C.S., s. 4119; 1997, c. 310, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “the personal representative shall” for “he shall.”

§ 30-26.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 19; Code, s. 2127; Rev., s. 3103; C.S., s. 4120; 1961, c. 749, s. 10; 1981, c. 413, s. 3; 1995, c. 262, s. 6; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 742, s. 17; 1997-310, s. 3; 2009-183, s. 2; repealed by Session 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012.